Illinois, session 104th, SB1901.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $70,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for expenses 7of planning, design, and environmental clearance of a new 8electrified high-speed line designed for speeds in excess of 9186 miles per hour in relation to the Statewide Railway 10Program. 11    Section 10. The amount of $230,000,000, or so much of that 12amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 13Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for expenses 14of capital improvements to railroad lines that currently host 15passenger trains, upgrades for existing railroad lines 16establish new passenger rail routes, or to new construct 17railroad lines to establish new passenger rail routes in 18relation to the Statewide Railway Program. Eligible expenses 19include: repairing, reconstructing, or building new railroad 20bridges; installing or modernizing overhead catenary for 21electrically powered trains; upgrading existing mainline 22tracks to FRA Class 4 standards or better; adding second or 23third mainline tracks; and installing train control systems.   SB1901- 2 -LRB104 08854 LNS 18909 b1    Section 15. The amount of $100,000,000, or so much of that 2amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 3Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for expenses 4of purchasing modern trains and the construction of new 5maintenance facilities or the modernization of existing 6maintenance facilities in relation to the Statewide Railway 7Program. 8    Section 20. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much of that 9amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 10Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for salaries 11and other expenses related to adding professional staff in the 12rail division of the Office of Intermodal Project 13Implementation in relation to the Statewide Railway Program. 14    Section 25. The amount of $100,000,000, or so much of that 15amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 16Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 17operation of passenger trains linking communities outside of 18the Regional Transportation Authority boundaries to Chicago 19and O'Hare and the operation of passenger trains linking 20communities outside of the Regional Transportation Authority 21boundaries to other communities outside of the Regional 22Transportation Authority boundaries in relation to the 23Statewide Railway Program.   SB1901- 3 -LRB104 08854 LNS 18909 b1    Section 30. The amount of $50,000,000, or so much of that 2amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 3Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for 4maintaining mainline tracks on passenger rail routes at Class 55 or better in relation to the Statewide Railway Program. 6    Section 35. The amount of $23,000,000, or so much of that 7amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 8Revenue Fund to the Department of Transportation for the 9operation of regional buses to connect communities without a 10railway station outside of the Regional Transportation 11Authority to the state passenger railway network and to 12supplement frequency on passenger rail routes in relation to 13the Statewide Railway Program. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152025.